Montana, session 2025, HB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-2-702, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-702. Restrictions on special licenses -- availability of bear and mountain lion licenses. (1)
A person who has killed or taken any game animal, except a deer, an elk, or an antelope, or a mountain lion,
during the current license year is not permitted to receive a special license under this chapter to hunt or kill a
second game animal of the same species.
(2) The commission may require applicants for special permits authorized by this chapter to obtain
a valid big game license for that species for the current year prior to applying for a special permit.
(3) Except as provided in 87-2-815, a person may take only one grizzly bear in Montana with a
license authorized by 87-2-701.
(4) (a) Except as provided in 87-1-271(2), 87-1-275, and 87-2-815, a person who receives a
moose, mountain goat, or limited mountain sheep license, as authorized by 87-2-701, with the exception of an
antlerless moose or an adult ewe game management license issued under 87-2-104, is not eligible to receive
another special license for that species for the next 7 years. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(a), "limited
mountain sheep license" means a license that is valid for an area in which the number of licenses issued is
restricted.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 71

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 71.1
(b) (i) Except as provided in 87-1-271(2) and 87-2-815, a person who takes a legal ram mountain
sheep with at least one horn that is equal to or greater than a three-fourths curl using an unlimited mountain
sheep license or a population management license issued pursuant to 87-2-701 is not eligible to receive
another special license for that species for the next 7 years. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(b)[(i)] (4)(b),
"unlimited mountain sheep license" means a license that is valid for an area in which the number of licenses
issued is not restricted.
[(ii) The department shall biennially report to the environmental quality council in accordance with
5-11-210 information on:
(A) mountain sheep harvested pursuant to this subsection (4) from the Tendoy Mountain herd;
(B) efforts to collect tissue samples and other biological information from mountain sheep
harvested from the Tendoy Mountain herd to determine the immunity of surviving herd members to pneumonia
outbreaks; and
(C) attempts by the department to share tissue samples and other biological information collected
from the Tendoy Mountain herd with Washington State University, other public entities, and private entities that
research the interaction between mountain sheep and domestic sheep.]
(5) An application for a wild buffalo or bison license must be made on the same form and is subject
to the same license application deadline as the special license for moose, mountain goat, and mountain sheep.
(Bracketed language in subsection (4)(b) terminates July 1, 2027--sec. 3, Ch. 186, L. 2017.)"
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 71